Utah statutes.
10-2-421.   Electric utility service in annexed area -- Reimbursement for
value of facilities.
(1)  If the electric consumers of the area being annexed are receiving
electric utility services from sources other than the annexing municipality,
the municipality may not, without the consent of the electric utility, furnish
its electric utility services to the electric consumers until the municipality
has reimbursed the electric utility company that previously provided the
services for the value of those facilities dedicated to provide service to the
annexed area.
(2)  If the annexing municipality and the electric utility cannot agree on the
value, the state court having jurisdiction shall determine the fair market
value of those facilities, and the municipality shall reimburse the fair
market value, as determined by the court, to the electric utility company.
